es: Mecanismo de sujeción del capo: Abrazadera de palanca/leva; Palanca de liberación rápida; Abrazadera de tornillo; Abrazadera de resorte; Gatillo; Otro
en: Capo clamping mechanism: Lever/cam clamp; Quick-release lever; Screw clamp; Spring clamp; Trigger squeeze; Other
bg-BG: Механизъм за пристягане на каподастъра: Лостова/ексцентрикова стяга; Лост за бързо освобождаване; Винтова стяга; Пружинна стяга; Спусъчна стяга; Друго
cs: Upínací mechanismus kapodastru: Páková/vačková svorka; Rychloupínací páka; Šroubová svorka; Pružinová svorka; Stlačovací mechanismus; Jiné
pt-PT: Mecanismo de fixação do capo: Grampo de alavanca/came; Alavanca de aperto rápido; Grampo de parafuso; Grampo de mola; Aperto de gatilho; Outro
hr-HR: Mehanizam za stezanje kapodastra: Stezaljka s polugom / ekscentrom; Poluga za brzo otpuštanje; Vijčana stezaljka; Opružna stezaljka; Okidač; Ostalo
zh-TW: 移調夾夾緊機制: 槓桿/凸輪夾; 快拆槓桿; 螺絲夾; 彈簧夾; 扳機壓合; 其他
sk-SK: Upínací mechanizmus kapodastra: Páková/vačková svorka; Rýchloupínacia páka; Skrutkovacia svorka; Pružinová svorka; Stláčacia svorka; Iný
th: กลไกการหนีบคาโป: แคลมป์งัด/ลูกเบี้ยว; คันโยกปลดเร็ว; แคลมป์สกรู; แคลมป์สปริง; แบบไกบีบ; อื่นๆ
nl: Capo klemmechanisme: Hendel/nokklem; Quick-release-hendel; Schroefklem; Veerklem; Knijpklem; Overige
sl-SI: Mehanizem za namestitev kapodastra: Objemka z ročico/ekscentrom; Ročica za hitro sprostitev; Vijačna spona; Vzmetna spona; Pritisk s sprožilcem; Drugo
fr: Mécanisme de serrage du capodastre: Pince à levier/came; Levier à libération rapide; Pince à vis; Pince à ressort; À gâchette; Autre
it: meccanismo di bloccaggio del capotasto: Morsetto a leva/camma; Leva a sgancio rapido; Morsetto a vite; Morsetto a molla; A grilletto; Altro
zh-CN: 卡波夹紧装置: 杠杆/凸轮夹; 快拆手柄; 螺旋夹; 弹簧夹; 扳机式; 其他
pt-BR: Mecanismo de fixação do capotraste: Grampo de alavanca/came; Alavanca de liberação rápida; Grampo de rosca; Grampo de mola; Aperto de gatilho; Outro
tr: Kapo sıkıştırma mekanizması: Mandal/kam kelepçesi; Hızlı açılan mandal; Vidalı kelepçe; Yaylı kelepçe; Tetikli sıkma; Diğer
nb: Klem- og låsemekanisme for capo: Spak-/kammekanisme; Hurtigutløserspak; Skruklemme; Fjærklemme; Avtrekkerklemme; Annet
vi: Cơ chế kẹp capo: Kẹp đòn bẩy/cam; Đòn bẩy nhả nhanh; Kẹp ốc vít; Kẹp lò xo; Bóp cò; Khác
sv: Capo-klämmekanism: Hävstångs-/kamklämma; Snabbkopplingsspak; Skruvklämma; Fjäderklämma; Avtryckarklämma; Annat
hu: Kápó bilincsmechanizmusa: Karos/bütykös rögzítő; Gyorskioldó kar; Csavaros rögzítő; Rugós rögzítő; Ravaszos rögzítő; Egyéb
ja: カポクランプメカニズム: レバー/カムクランプ; クイックリリースレバー; スクリュークランプ; スプリングクランプ; トリガースクイーズ; その他
da: Kapodasterens spændingsmekanisme: Greb/kam-klemme; Quick-release-greb; Skrueklemme; Fjederklemme; Pistolgreb; Andet
ro-RO: Mecanism de prindere a capodastrului: Clemă cu pârghie/camă; Pârghie cu eliberare rapidă; Clemă cu șurub; Clemă cu arc; Declanșator cu strângere; Altele
pl: Mechanizm zaciskowy kapodastra: Zacisk dźwigniowy/krzywkowy; Dźwignia szybkozamykacza; Zacisk śrubowy; Zacisk sprężynowy; Zacisk pistoletowy; Inne
de: Klemmmechanismus des Kapodasters: Hebel-/Nockenklemme; Schnellspannhebel; Schraubklemme; Federklemme; Trigger-Griff; Sonstige
ru: Механизм зажима каподастра: Рычажный/эксцентриковый зажим; Быстрозажимной рычаг; Винтовой зажим; Пружинный зажим; Триггерный зажим; Другое
el: Μηχανισμός σύσφιξης καποτάστου: Σφιγκτήρας με μοχλό/έκκεντρο; Μοχλός γρήγορης απελευθέρωσης; Βιδωτός σφιγκτήρας; Σφιγκτήρας με ελατήριο; Συμπίεση με σκανδάλη; Άλλο
fi: Capon puristusmekanismi: Vipu-/nokkapuristin; Pikalukitusvipu; Ruuvipuristin; Jousipuristin; Liipaisinpuristin; Muu
lt-LT: Kapodastro suspaudimo mechanizmas: Svirtinis / kumštelinis spaustukas; Greito atleidimo svirtis; Sraigtinis spaustukas; Spyruoklinis spaustukas; Gaidukinis (suspaudžiamas); Kita
ko: 카포 클램핑 메커니즘: 레버/캠 클램프; 퀵 릴리스 레버; 스크류 클램프; 스프링 클램프; 트리거 스퀴즈; 기타